Florida, session 2026, SB1312.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 46 47 Section 1.âSection 461.0181, Florida Statutes, is created 48 to read: 49 461.0181âInterstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact. 50 The Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact is hereby 51 enacted into law and entered into by this state with all other 52 states legally joining therein in the form substantially as 53 follows: 54 55 INTERSTATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT 56 57 ARTICLE I 58 PURPOSE 59 60 (1)âIn order to strengthen access to health care, and in 61 recognition of the advances in the delivery in health care, the 62 member states of the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure 63 Compact have allied in common purpose to develop a comprehensive 64 process that complements the existing licensing and regulatory 65 authority of state podiatric medical boards and provides a 66 streamlined process that allows podiatric physicians to become 67 licensed in multiple states, enhancing the portability of a 68 podiatric medical license and ensuring the safety of patients. 69 (2)âThe compact creates another pathway for licensure and 70 does not otherwise change a stateâs existing Podiatric Medical 71 Practice Act. The compact also adopts the prevailing standard 72 for licensure and affirms that the practice of podiatric 73 medicine occurs where the patient is located at the time of the 74 podiatric physician-patient encounter, and therefore, requires 75 the podiatric physician to be under the jurisdiction of the 76 state podiatric medical board where the patient is located. 77 State podiatric medical boards that participate in the compact 78 retain the jurisdiction to impose an adverse action against a 79 license to practice podiatric medicine in that state issued to a 80 podiatric physician through the procedures in the compact. 81 82 ARTICLE II 83 DEFINITIONS 84 85 As used in this compact, the term: 86 (1)ââBylawsâ means those bylaws established by the 87 commission pursuant to Article XI. 88 (2)ââCommissionâ means the Interstate Podiatric Medical 89 Licensure Compact Commission created pursuant to Article XI. 90 (3)ââCommissionerâ means the voting representative 91 appointed by each member board pursuant to Article XI. 92 (4)ââConvictionâ means a finding by a court that an 93 individual is guilty of a criminal offense through adjudication, 94 or entry of a plea of guilt or no contest to the charge by the 95 offender. Evidence of an entry of conviction of a criminal 96 offense by the court shall be considered final for purposes of 97 disciplinary action by a member board. 98 (5)ââCriminal background checkâ means that the member board 99 is authorized to obtain a Federal Bureau of Investigation 100 biometric based on a federal criminal records check information 101 report from the authorized state agency for the exclusive 102 purpose of determining eligibility for certification of 103 qualification that would allow for an expedited license. 104 (6)ââExpedited licenseâ means a full unrestricted podiatric 105 medical license granted by a member state to an eligible 106 podiatric physician through the process set forth in the 107 compact. 108 (7)ââFederal criminal records check informationâ means any 109 information obtained by a member board from the Federal Bureau 110 of Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check 111 performed by a member board under Pub. L. No. 92-544. 112 (8)ââLicenseâ means authorization by a member state for a 113 podiatric physician to engage in the practice of podiatric 114 medicine, which would be unlawful without authorization. 115 (9)ââMember boardâ means a state agency in a member state 116 which acts in the sovereign interest of the state by protecting 117 the public through licensure, regulation, and education of 118 podiatric physicians as directed by the state government. 119 (10)ââMember stateâ means a state that has enacted the 120 compact. 121 (11)ââOffenseâ means a felony, gross misdemeanor, or a 122 misdemeanor related to the practice of podiatry. 123 (12)ââPodiatric Medical Practice Actâ means applicable laws 124 and regulations governing the practice of podiatric medicine 125 within a member state. 126 (13)ââPodiatric physicianâ means any person who: 127 (a)âIs a graduate of a podiatric medical school accredited 128 by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education. 129 (b)âPassed parts I, II, and III of the National Board of 130 Podiatric Medical Examinersâ (NBPME), the American Podiatric 131 Medical Licensing Examination (APMLE), or NBPME or APMLE 132 recognized replacement examinations. 133 (c)âSuccessfully completed a podiatric residency program 134 approved by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education. 135 (d)âHolds specialty certification from a specialty board 136 recognized by the Council on Podiatric Medical Education. 137 (e)âPossesses a full and unrestricted license to engage in 138 the practice of podiatric medicine issued by a member board. 139 (f)âHas never been convicted of or received adjudication, 140 deferred adjudication, community supervision, or deferred 141 disposition for any offense by a court of appropriate 142 jurisdiction. 143 (g)âHas never held a license authorizing the practice of 144 podiatric medicine subjected to discipline by a licensing agency 145 in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, excluding any 146 action related to the nonpayment of fees related to a license. 147 (h)âHas never had a controlled substance license or permit 148 suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug 149 Enforcement Administration or voluntarily surrendered such 150 license after notification of investigation. 151 (i)âIs not under active investigation by a licensing agency 152 or law enforcement authority in any state, federal, or foreign 153 jurisdiction. 154 (14)ââPractice of podiatric medicineâ means that clinical 155 prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of human disease, injury, or 156 condition requiring a podiatric physician to obtain and maintain 157 a license in compliance with the Podiatric Medical Practice Act 158 of a member state. 159 (15)ââRuleâ means a written statement by the commission 160 adopted pursuant to Article XII of the compact which is of 161 general applicability; implements, interprets, or prescribes a 162 policy or provision of the compact, or an organizational, 163 procedural, or practice requirement of the commission; and has 164 the force and effect of statutory law in a member state. The 165 term includes the amendment, repeal, or suspension of an 166 existing rule. 167 (16)ââStateâ means any state, commonwealth, district, or 168 territory of the United States. 169 (17)ââState of principal licenseâ means a member state 170 where a podiatric physician holds a license to practice 171 podiatric medicine and which has been designated by such a 172 podiatric physician for purposes of registration and 173 participation in the compact. 174 175 ARTICLE III 176 ELIGIBILITY 177 178 (1)âA podiatric physician must meet the eligibility 179 requirements as provided in subsection (13) of Article II to 180 receive an expedited licensure under the terms and provisions of 181 the compact. 182 (2)âA podiatric physician who does not meet the 183 requirements in subsection (13) of Article II may obtain a 184 license to practice podiatric medicine in a member state if the 185 individual complies with all laws and requirements, other than 186 the compact, relating to the issuance of a license to practice 187 podiatric medicine in that state. 188 189 ARTICLE IV 190 DESIGNATION OF STATE OF PRINCIPAL LICENSE 191 192 (1)âA podiatric physician must designate a member state as 193 his or her state of principal license for purposes of 194 registration for expedited licensure through the compact if the 195 podiatric physician possesses a full and unrestricted license to 196 practice podiatric medicine in that state and the state is: 197 (a)âThe state of principal residence for the podiatric 198 physician; 199 (b)âThe state where at least 25 percent of his or her 200 practice of podiatric medicine occurs; 201 (c)âThe location of the podiatric physicianâs employer; or 202 (d)âIf a state does not qualify under paragraph (a), 203 paragraph (b), or paragraph (c), the state designated as the 204 podiatric physicianâs state of residence for the purpose of 205 federal income tax. 206 (2)âA podiatric physician may redesignate a member state as 207 his or her state of principal license at any time, as long as 208 the state meets one of the requirements of subsection (1). 209 (3)âThe commission is authorized to develop rules to 210 facilitate redesignation of another member state as the state of 211 principal license. 212 213 ARTICLE V 214 ISSUANCE OF EXPEDITED LICENSURE 215 216 (1)âA podiatric physician seeking licensure through the 217 compact must file an application for an expedited license with 218 the member board of the state selected by the podiatric 219 physician as the state of principal license. 220 (2)âUpon receipt of an application for an expedited 221 license, the member board within the state selected as the state 222 of principal license shall evaluate whether the podiatric 223 physician is eligible for expedited licensure and issue a letter 224 of qualification, verifying or denying the podiatric physicianâs 225 eligibility, in the manner established by rule of the 226 commission. 227 (a)âQualification includes verification of podiatric 228 medical education, podiatric graduate medical education, results 229 of any podiatric medical licensing examination, and other 230 qualifications as determined by the commission by rule, and may 231 not be subject to additional primary source verification where a 232 primary source has already been verified by the state of 233 principal license. 234 (b)âThe member board within the state selected as the state 235 of principal license shall, in the course of verifying 236 eligibility, perform a criminal background check of an 237 applicant, including the use of results of fingerprint or other 238 biometric data checks compliant with the requirements of the 239 Federal Bureau of Investigation with the exception of federal 240 employees who have suitability determination in accordance with 241 5 C.F.R. s. 731.202. 242 1.âCommunication between a member board and the commission 243 and communication between member boards regarding the 244 verification of eligibility in Article III through the compact 245 may not include any information received from the Federal Bureau 246 of Investigation relating to a federal criminal records check 247 performed by a member board under Pub. L. No. 92-544, including 248 federal criminal records check information. 249 2.âFederal Bureau of Investigation information obtained by 250 a member board may not be shared with the commission. 251 (c)âAppeal of the determination of eligibility must be made 252 to the member state where the application was filed and is 253 subject to the law of that state. 254 (3)âUpon verification in paragraph (2)(b), a podiatric 255 physician shall complete the registration process established by 256 the commission to receive a license in a member state selected 257 pursuant to subsection (1), including the payment of all 258 applicable fees. 259 (4)âAfter receiving verification of eligibility under 260 subsection (2) and the payment of all applicable fees under 261 subsection (3), a member board shall issue an expedited license 262 to the podiatric physician. This license shall authorize the 263 podiatric physician to practice podiatric medicine in the 264 issuing state consistent with the Podiatric Medical Practice Act 265 and all appliable laws and regulations of the issuing member 266 board and member state. 267 (5)âAn expedited license is valid for a period consistent 268 with the licensure period in the member state and in the same 269 manner as required for other podiatric physicians holding a full 270 and unrestricted license within the member state. 271 (6)âAn expedited license obtained through the compact must 272 be terminated if a podiatric physician fails to maintain a 273 license in the state of principal licensure for a 274 nondisciplinary reason, without redesignation of a new state of 275 principal licensure. 276 (7)âThe commission is authorized to develop rules regarding 277 the application process, including payment of all applicable 278 fees, and the reporting of the issuance of an expedited license 279 by a member board to the commission. 280 281 ARTICLE VI 282 FEES FOR EXPEDITED LICENSURE 283 284 (1)âA member state issuing an expedited license authorizing 285 the practice of podiatric medicine in that state may impose a 286 fee for a license issued or renewed through the compact. 287 (2)âThe commission is authorized to develop rules regarding 288 fees for expedited licenses. 289 290 ARTICLE VII 291 RENEWAL AND CONTINUED PARTICIPATION 292 293 (1)âA podiatric physician seeking to renew an expedited 294 license granted in a member state must complete a renewal 295 process with the commission if the podiatric physician: 296 (a)âMaintains a full and unrestricted license in a state of 297 principal license; 298 (b)âHas not been convicted of or received adjudication, 299 deferred adjudication, community supervision, or deferred 300 disposition for any offense by a court of appropriate 301 jurisdiction; 302 (c)âHas not had a license authorizing the practice of 303 podiatric medicine subject to discipline by a licensing agency 304 in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction, or voluntarily 305 surrendered such license in lieu of discipline, excluding any 306 action related to nonpayment of fees related to a license; and 307 (d)âHas not had a controlled substance license or permit 308 suspended or revoked by a state or the United States Drug 309 Enforcement Administration or voluntarily surrendered such 310 license or permit after notification of investigation. 311 (2)âPodiatric physicians shall comply with all continuing 312 professional development or continuing medical education 313 requirements for renewal of a license issued by a member state. 314 (3)âThe commission shall collect any renewal fees charged 315 for the renewal of a license and distribute the fees to the 316 applicable member board. 317 (4)âUpon receipt of the renewal fees collected in 318 subsection (3), a member board shall renew the podiatric 319 physicianâs license. 320 (5)âPodiatric physician information collected by the 321 commission during the renewal process will be distributed to all 322 member boards. 323 (6)âThe commission is authorized to develop rules to 324 address renewal of licenses obtained through the compact. 325 326 ARTICLE VIII 327 COORDINATED INFORMATION SYSTEM 328 329 (1)âThe commission shall establish a coordinated 330 information system of all podiatric physicians who are licensed 331 or who have applied for licensure under Article V. 332 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of law, member 333 boards shall report to the commission any public action or 334 public complaints against a licensed podiatric physician who has 335 applied for or received an expedited license through the 336 compact. 337 (3)âMember boards shall report disciplinary or 338 investigatory information determined as necessary and proper by 339 rule of the commission. 340 (4)âMember boards may report any nonpublic complaint or any 341 disciplinary or investigatory information not required by 342 subsection (3) to the commission. 343 (5)âMember boards shall share complaint or disciplinary or 344 investigatory information about a podiatric physician upon 345 request of another member board. 346 (6)âAll information provided to the commission or 347 distributed by member boards is confidential, must be filed 348 under seal, and may be used only for investigatory or 349 disciplinary matters. 350 (7)âThe commission is authorized to develop rules for 351 mandated or discretionary sharing of information by member 352 boards. 353 354 ARTICLE IX 355 JOINT INVESTIGATIONS 356 357 (1)âLicensure and disciplinary records of podiatric 358 physicians are deemed investigative. 359 (2)âIn addition to the authority granted to a member board 360 by its respective Podiatric Medical Practice Act, a member board 361 may participate with other member boards in joint investigations 362 of podiatric physicians licensed by the member boards. 363 (3)âA subpoena issued by a member state as part of a joint 364 investigation is enforceable in other member states. 365 (4)âMember boards may share any investigative, litigation, 366 or compliance materials in furtherance of any joint or 367 individual investigation initiated under the compact. 368 (5)âAny member state may investigate an actual or alleged 369 violation of the laws authorizing the practice of podiatric 370 medicine in any other member state in which a podiatric 371 physician holds a license to practice podiatric medicine. 372 373 ARTICLE X 374 DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS 375 376 (1)âAny disciplinary action taken by any member board 377 against a podiatric physician licensed through the compact shall 378 be deemed unprofessional conduct, which may be subject to 379 discipline by other member boards, in addition to any violation 380 of the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of that state. 381 (2)âIf a license granted to a podiatric physician by a 382 member board in the state of principal license is revoked, 383 surrendered, or relinquished in lieu of discipline, or 384 suspended, all licenses issued to the podiatric physician by 385 member boards must automatically be placed, without further 386 action necessary by any member board, on the same status. If the 387 member board of the state of principal license subsequently 388 reinstates the podiatric physicianâs license, a license issued 389 to the podiatric physician by any other member board must remain 390 encumbered until that respective member board takes action to 391 reinstate the license in a manner consistent with the Podiatric 392 Medical Practice Act of that state. 393 (3)âIf disciplinary action is taken against a podiatric 394 physician by a member board not in a state of principal license, 395 any other member board may deem the action conclusive as to 396 matter of law and fact decided, and: 397 (a)âImpose the same or lesser sanctions against the 398 podiatric physician, so long as such sanctions are consistent 399 with the Podiatric Medical Practice Act of that state; or 400 (b)âPursue separate disciplinary action against the 401 podiatric physician under its respective Podiatric Medical 402 Practice Act of that state, regardless of the action taken in 403 other member states. 404 (4)âIf a license granted to a podiatric physician by a 405 member board is revoked, surrendered or relinquished in lieu of 406 discipline, or suspended, any license issued to a podiatric 407 physician by any other member board must be suspended, 408 automatically and immediately without further action necessary 409 by the other member boards, for 90 days upon entry of the order 410 by the disciplining board, to permit the member boards to 411 investigate the basis for the action under the Podiatric Medical 412 Practice Act of that state. 413 (5)âA member board may terminate the automatic provision 414 under subsection (2) or subsection (4) of a license it issued, 415 in a manner consistent with the Podiatric Medical Practice Act 416 of that state. 417 418 ARTICLE XI 419 INTERSTATE PODIATRIC MEDICAL LICENSURE COMPACT COMMISSION 420 421 (1)âThe member states hereby create the Interstate 422 Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact Commission. 423 (2)âThe purpose of the commission is the administration of 424 the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact, which is a 425 discretionary state function. 426 (3)âThe commission shall be a body corporate and joint 427 agency of the member states and shall have all the 428 responsibilities, powers, and duties set forth in the compact, 429 and such additional powers as may be conferred upon it by a 430 subsequent concurrent action of the respective legislatures of 431 the member states in accordance with the terms of the compact. 432 (4)âThe commission shall be composed of one voting 433 representative appointed by each member state who shall serve as 434 a commissioner. A commissioner shall be: 435 (a)âA podiatric physician appointed to a member board; 436 (b)âAn executive director, executive secretary, or similar 437 executive of a member board; or 438 (c)âA member of the public appointed to a member board. 439 (5)âThe commission shall meet at least once each calendar 440 year. A portion of this meeting must be a business meeting to 441 address such matters as may properly come before the commission, 442 including the election of officers. The chair may call 443 additional meetings and shall call for a meeting upon the 444 request of a majority of the member states. 445 (6)âThe bylaws may provide for meetings of the commission 446 to be conducted, in whole or in part, by teleconference, video 447 conference, or other electronic means by which all participants 448 can hear each other simultaneously and participate effectively. 449 Attendance by such electronic means shall constitute presence in 450 person at the meeting. 451 (7)âEach commissioner participating at a meeting of the 452 commission is entitled to one vote. A majority of commissioners 453 shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, 454 unless a larger quorum is required by commission bylaws. A 455 commissioner may not delegate a vote to another commissioner. In 456 the absence of its commissioner, a member state may delegate 457 voting authority for a specified meeting to another person from 458 that state who must meet the requirements of subsection (4). 459 (8)âThe commission shall provide public notice of all 460 meetings and all meetings shall be open to the public. The 461 commission may close a meeting, in full or in portion, where it 462 determines by a two-thirds vote of the commissioners present 463 that any open meeting would be likely to: 464 (a)âRelate solely to the internal personnel practices and 465 procedures of the commission; 466 (b)âDiscuss matters specifically exempted from disclosure 467 by federal law; 468 (c)âDiscuss trade secrets or commercial or financial 469 information that is privileged or confidential; 470 (d)âInvolve accusing a person of a crime, or formally 471 censuring a person; 472 (e)âDiscuss information of a personal nature where 473 disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of 474 personal privacy; 475 (f)âDiscuss investigative records compiled for law 476 enforcement purposes; or 477 (g)âSpecifically relate to the participation in a civil 478 action or other legal proceeding. 479 (9)âThe commission shall keep minutes that fully describe 480 all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and 481 accurate summary of actions taken, including a record of any 482 roll call votes. 483 (10)âThe commission shall make its information and official 484 records, to the extent not otherwise designated in the compact 485 or by its rules, available to the public for inspection. 486 (11)âThe commission shall establish an executive committee, 487 which shall include officers, members, and others as determined 488 by the bylaws. The executive committee shall have the power to 489 act on behalf of the commission, with the exception of 490 rulemaking, during periods when the commission is not in 491 session. When acting on behalf of the commission, the executive 492 committee shall oversee the administration of the compact, 493 including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the 494 compact, its bylaws and rules, and other such duties as 495 necessary. 496 (12)âThe commission shall establish other committees for 497 governance and administration of the compact. 498 499 ARTICLE XII 500 POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION 501 502 The commission shall: 503 (1)âOversee and maintain the administration of the compact; 504 (2)âAdopt rules that shall be binding to the extent and in 505 the manner provided for in the compact; 506 (3)âIssue, upon the request of a member state or member 507 board, advisory opinions concerning the meeting or 508 interpretation of the compact, its bylaws, rules, and actions; 509 (4)âEnforce compliance with compact provisions, the rules 510 adopted by the commission, and the bylaws, using all necessary 511 and proper means, including, but not limited to, the use of 512 judicial process; 513 (5)âEstablish and appoint committees, including, but not 514 limited to, an executive committee as required by Article XI, 515 which shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission in 516 carrying out its powers and duties; 517 (6)âPay, or provide for the payment of, the expenses 518 related to the establishment, organization, and ongoing 519 activities of the commission; 520 (7)âEstablish and maintain one or more offices; 521 (8)âBorrow, accept, hire, or contract for services of 522 personnel; 523 (9)âPurchase and maintain insurance and bonds; 524 (10)âEmploy an executive director who shall have the power 525 to employ, select, or appoint employees, agents, or consultants 526 and determine their qualifications, define their duties, and fix 527 their compensation; 528 (11)âEstablish personnel policies and programs relating to 529 conflicts of interest, rates of compensation, and qualification 530 of personnel; 531 (12)âAccept donations and grants of money, equipment, 532 supplies, materials, and services to receive, use, and dispose 533 of in a manner consistent with the conflict of interest policies 534 established by the commission; 535 (13)âLease, purchase, accept contributions or donations of, 536 or otherwise own, hold, improve, or use any property, real, 537 personal, or mixed; 538 (14)âSell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 539 abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property, real, personal, 540 or mixed; 541 (15)âEstablish a budget and make expenditures; 542 (16)âAdopt a seal and bylaws governing the management and 543 operation of the commission; 544 (17)âReport annually to the legislatures and governors of 545 the member states concerning the activities of the commission 546 during the preceding year. Such reports must also include 547 reports of financial audits, and financial statements, and any 548 recommendation that may have been adopted by the commission; 549 (18)âCoordinate education, training, and public awareness 550 regarding the compact, its implementation, and its operation; 551 (19)âMaintain records in accordance with the bylaws; 552 (20)âSeek and obtain trademarks, copyrights, and patents; 553 and 554 (21)âPerform such functions as may be necessary or 555 appropriate to achieve the purpose of the compact. 556 557 ARTICLE XIII 558 FINANCIAL POWERS 559 560 (1)âThe commission may levy and collect an annual 561 assessment from each member state to cover the cost of the 562 operations and activities of the commission and its staff. The 563 total assessment must be sufficient to cover the annual budget 564 approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other 565 sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount shall be 566 allocated upon a formula to be determined by the commission, 567 which shall adopt a rule binding upon all member states. 568 (2)âThe commission may not incur obligations of any kind 569 before securing the funds adequate to meet the same. 570 (3)âThe commission may not pledge the credit of any of the 571 member states, except by, and with the authority of, the member 572 state. 573 (4)âThe commission shall maintain financial records in 574 accordance with the bylaws, including profit and loss statements 575 and balance sheet reports, which must be included in the annual 576 report of the commission. 577 578 ARTICLE XIV 579 ORGANIZATION AND OPERATION OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION 580 581 (1)âThe commission shall, by a majority of commissioners 582 present and voting, adopt bylaws to govern its conduct as may be 583 necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of the 584 compact within 12 months after the first commission meeting. 585 (2)âThe commission shall elect or appoint annually from 586 among its commissioners a chair, a vice chair, and a treasurer, 587 each of whom shall have such authority and duties as may be 588 specified in the bylaws. The chair or, in the chairâs absence or 589 disability, the vice chair shall preside at all meetings of the 590 commission. 591 (3)âOfficers selected in subsection (2) shall serve without 592 remuneration from the commission. 593 (4)âThe officers and employees of the commission shall be 594 immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their 595 official capacity, for a claim for damage to or loss of property 596 or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising 597 out of, or relating to, an actual or alleged act, error, or 598 omission that occurred, or that such person had a reasonable 599 basis for believing occurred, within the scope of the commission 600 employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that such 601 person may not be protected from suit or liability for damage, 602 loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful 603 and wanton misconduct of such person. 604 (5)âThe liability of the executive director and employees 605 of the commission or representatives of the commission, acting 606 within the scope of their employment or duties for acts, errors, 607 or omissions occurring within their state, may not exceed the 608 limits of liability set forth under the constitution and laws of 609 that state for state officials, employees, and agents. The 610 commission is considered to be an instrumentality of the states 611 for the purpose of such action. This subsection does not protect 612 such persons from suit or liability for damages, losses, injury, 613 or liability caused by the intentional or willful and wanton 614 misconduct of such persons. 615 (6)âThe commission shall defend the executive director and 616 its employees, and subject to the approval of the attorney 617 general or other appropriate legal counsel of the member state 618 represented by the commission representative, shall defend such 619 commission representative in any civil action seeking to impose 620 liability arising out of an actual or alleged act, error, or 621 omission that occurred within the scope of commission 622 employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the defendant 623 had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope 624 of the commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, 625 provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did 626 not result from intentional or willful and wanton misconduct on 627 the part of such person. 628 (7)âTo the extent not covered by the state involved, member 629 state, or the commission, the representatives or employees of 630 the commission shall be held harmless in the amount of a 631 settlement or judgment, including attorney fees and costs, 632 obtained against such persons arising out of an actual or 633 alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope 634 of the commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or 635 that such persons had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 636 within the scope of commission employment, duties, or 637 responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 638 error, or omission did not result from intentional or willful 639 and wanton misconduct on the part of such person. 640 641 ARTICLE XV 642 RULEMAKING FUNCTIONS OF THE INTERSTATE COMMISSION 643 644 (1)âThe commission shall adopt rules in order to 645 effectively and efficiently achieve the purpose of the compact. 646 In the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority 647 in a manner beyond the scope of the purposes of the compact, or 648 the powers granted hereunder, such action by the commission 649 shall be invalid and have no force or effect. 650 (2)âRules deemed appropriate for the operations of the 651 commission shall be made pursuant to the rulemaking process that 652 substantially conforms to the Model State Administrative 653 Procedure Act of 2010, and subsequent amendments thereto. 654 (3)âNo later than 30 days after a rule is adopted, a person 655 may file a petition for judicial review of the rule in the 656 United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the 657 federal district where the commission has its principal offices, 658 provided that the filing of such a petition does not stay or 659 otherwise prevent the rule from becoming effective, unless the 660 court finds that the petitioner has a substantial likelihood of 661 success. The court shall give deference to the actions of the 662 commission consistent with applicable law and may not find the 663 rule to be unlawful if the rule represents a reasonable exercise 664 of the authority granted to the commission. 665 666 ARTICLE XVI 667 OVERSIGHT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT 668 669 (1)âThe executive, legislative, and judicial branches of 670 state government in each member state shall enforce the compact 671 and shall take all actions necessary and appropriate to 672 effectuate the compactâs purposes and intent. The provisions of 673 the compact and the rules adopted hereunder shall have standing 674 as statutory law but may not override existing state authority 675 to regulate the practice of podiatric medicine. 676 (2)âAll courts shall take judicial notice of the compact 677 and the rules in any judicial or administrative proceeding in a 678 member state pertaining to the subject matter of the compact 679 which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the 680 commission. 681 (3)âThe commission shall be entitled to receive all 682 services of process in any such proceeding, and shall have 683 standing to intervene in the proceeding for all purposes. 684 Failure to provide service of process to the commission shall 685 render a judgment or order void as to the commission, the 686 compact, or adopted rules. 687 688 ARTICLE XVII 689 ENFORCEMENT OF INTERSTATE COMPACT 690 691 (1)âThe commission, in the reasonable exercise of its 692 discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of the 693 compact. 694 (2)âThe commission may, by majority vote of the 695 commissioners present and voting, initiate legal action in the 696 United States Court for the District of Columbia or, at the 697 discretion of the commission, in the federal district where the 698 commission has its principal offices, to enforce compliance with 699 the provisions of the compact, and its adopted rules and 700 commission bylaws, against a member state in default. The relief 701 sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the 702 event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party 703 shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including 704 reasonable attorney fees. 705 (3)âThe remedies herein may not be the exclusive remedies 706 of the commission. The commission may avail itself of any other 707 remedy available under state law or regulation of a profession. 708 709 ARTICLE XVIII 710 DEFAULT PROCEDURES 711 712 (1)âThe grounds for default include, but are not limited 713 to, failure of a member board to perform such obligations or 714 responsibilities imposed upon it by the compact or the rules and 715 bylaws of the commission adopted under the compact. 716 (2)âIf the commission determines that a member state has 717 defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 718 responsibilities under the compact, the bylaws, or adopted 719 rules, the commission must: 720 (a)âProvide written notice to the defaulting state and 721 other member states of the nature of the default, the means of 722 curing the default, and any action taken by the commission. The 723 commission shall specify the conditions by which the defaulting 724 state must cure its default; and 725 (b)âProvide remedial training and specific technical 726 assistance regarding the default. 727 (3)âIf the defaulting state fails to cure the default, the 728 defaulting state must be terminated from the compact upon an 729 affirmative vote of the majority of the commissioners present 730 and voting, and all rights, privileges, and benefits conferred 731 by the compact shall terminate on the effective date of 732 termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the 733 offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during 734 the period of default. 735 (4)âTermination of membership in the compact may be imposed 736 only after all other means of securing compliance have been 737 exhausted. Notice of intent to terminate shall be given by the 738 commission to the Governor, the Majority and Minority Leaders of 739 the defaulting stateâs legislature, and each of the member 740 states. 741 (5)âThe commission shall establish rules and procedures to 742 address licenses and podiatric physicians that are materially 743 impacted by the termination of a member state or the withdrawal 744 of a member state. 745 (6)âThe member state that has been terminated is 746 responsible for all dues, obligations, and liabilities incurred 747 through the effective date of termination, including obligations 748 the performance of which extend beyond the effective date of 749 termination. 750 (7)âThe commission may not bear any costs relating to any 751 state that has been found to be in default or that has been 752 terminated from the compact, unless otherwise mutually agreed 753 upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. 754 (8)âThe defaulting state may appeal the action of the 755 commission by petitioning the United States District Court for 756 the District of Columbia or the federal district where the 757 commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall 758 be awarded all costs of litigation, including reasonable 759 attorney fees. 760 761 ARTICLE XIX 762 DISPUTE RESOLUTION 763 764 (1)âThe commission shall attempt, upon the request of a 765 member state, to resolve disputes that are subject to the 766 compact and that arise among member states or member boards. 767 (2)âThe commission shall adopt rules providing for both 768 mediation and binding dispute resolution, as appropriate. 769 770 ARTICLE XX 771 MEMBERSHIP, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND AMENDMENT 772 773 (1)âAny state is eligible to become a member of the 774 compact. 775 (2)âThe compact shall become effective and binding upon 776 legislative enactment of the compact into law by at least four 777 states. Thereafter, it shall become effective and binding on a 778 state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. 779 (3)âThe governors of nonmember states, or their designees, 780 are welcome to participate in the activities of the commission 781 on a nonvoting basis before adoption of the compact by all 782 states. 783 (4)âThe commission may propose amendments to the compact 784 for enactment by the member states. An amendment may not become 785 effective and binding upon the commission and other member 786 states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous 787 consent of the member states. 788 789 ARTICLE XXI 790 WITHDRAWAL 791 792 (1)âOnce effective, the compact shall continue in force and 793 remain binding upon each member state; however, a member state 794 may withdraw from the compact by specifically repealing the 795 statute that enacted the compact into law. 796 (2)âWithdrawal from the compact shall be by the enactment 797 of a statute repealing the same, but may not take effect until 1 798 year after the effective date of such statute and until written 799 notice of the withdrawal has been given by the withdrawing state 800 to the governor of each other member state. 801 (3)âThe withdrawing state shall immediately notify the 802 chair of the commission in writing upon the introduction of 803 legislation repealing the compact in the withdrawing state. 804 (4)âThe commission shall notify the other member states of 805 the withdrawing stateâs intent to withdraw within 60 days after 806 its receipt of notice provided under subsection (3). 807 (5)âThe withdrawing state is responsible for all dues, 808 obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date 809 of withdrawal, including obligations the performance of which 810 extend beyond the effective date of withdrawal. 811 (6)âReinstatement following withdrawal of a member state 812 shall occur upon the withdrawing date reenacting the compact or 813 upon such later date as determined by the commission. 814 (7)âThe commission is authorized to develop rules to 815 address the impact of the withdrawal of a member state on 816 licenses granted in other member states to podiatric physicians 817 who designated the withdrawing member state as the state of 818 principal license. 819 820 ARTICLE XXII 821 DISSOLUTION 822 823 (1)âThe compact shall be dissolved effective upon the date 824 of the withdrawal or default of the member state which reduces 825 the membership of the compact to one member state. 826 (2)âUpon the dissolution of the compact, the compact 827 becomes null and void and shall have no further force or effect, 828 the business and affairs of the commission shall be concluded, 829 and surplus funds shall be distributed in accordance with the 830 bylaws. 831 832 ARTICLE XXIII 833 SEVERABILITY AND CONSTRUCTION 834 835 (1)âThe provisions of the compact shall be severable, and 836 if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision is deemed 837 unenforceable, the remaining provisions of the compact shall be 838 enforceable. 839 (2)âThe provisions of the compact shall be liberally 840 construed to effectuate its purposes. 841 (3)âThe compact does not prohibit the applicability of 842 other interstate compacts to which the member states are 843 members. 844 845 ARTICLE XXIV 846 BINDING EFFECT OF COMPACT AND OTHER LAWS 847 848 (1)âNothing herein prevents the enforcement of any other 849 law of a member state which is not inconsistent with the 850 compact. 851 (2)âAll laws in a member state in conflict with the compact 852 are superseded to the extent of the conflict. 853 (3)âAll lawful actions of the commission, including all 854 rules and bylaws adopted by the commission, are binding upon all 855 member states. 856 (4)âAll agreements between the commission and the member 857 states are binding in accordance with their terms. 858 (5)âIn the event any provision of the compact exceeds the 859 constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member 860 state, such provision is ineffective to the extent of the 861 conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that 862 member state. 863 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.